Georgia, session 2025_26, HB451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that hunter education courses provide young and beginning
hunters with the information that they need to understand the purposes of hunting, general
hunting practices, the conservation ethic shared by sportsmen and women, an appreciation
for the wildlife of this state, and much more. Providing a hunting safety course in the public
schools of this state is a great way to train and recruit the next generation of sportsmen and
women, teach youth about the benefits of hunting and fishing, and build support for
sportsmen and women led wildlife conservation.
H. B. 451 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 61 0144S
SECTION 2.
Part 14 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to other educational programs under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended
by revising Code Section 20-2-308, which is reserved, as follows:
"20-2-308.
(a) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, each local board of education shall be
authorized to provide instruction in hunting safety in grades six through 12, which
instruction may be incorporated into an existing course of study.
(b) No later than April 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall adopt content standards
for such instruction in hunting safety.
(c) Each local board of education shall be authorized to establish a curriculum for
instruction in hunting safety, which curriculum shall be based on the hunter education
courses offered by the Department of Natural Resources.
(d) Instruction in hunting safety offered pursuant to this Code section shall be taught by
an individual who is certified as a hunter education instructor by the Department of Natural
Resources. Reserved."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 451 (SUB)
- 2 -